South Dakota, session 2026, HB1317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-13-35.4 be AMENDED:
10-13-35.4. For taxes payable in the year 2003 and each year thereafter, the The
county auditor shall calculate what the maximum amount of revenue payable that the
county or municipality may request, based on growth and the index factor pursuant to
§ 10-13-35. The calculation shall must also show any accumulative percent of the unused
index factor not used accumulated since 2024 by the county or municipality. This
calculation shall exclude excludes the levy pursuant to § 10-13-36.
Section 2. That § 10-13-35.5 be AMENDED:
10-13-35.5. The A county or municipality may increase the total amount of
revenue payable from taxes on real property in any year up to the maximum amount
calculated in accordance with § 10-13-35.4 utilizing any accumulated unused index factor
from the prior three years. However, such an amount may not exceed the prior three year
index factor total or ten percent, whichever is less.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.